Wisconsin, session 2025, AB521.
do enact as follows:AB521,11Section 1. 84.305 (1) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:AB521,2,5284.305 (1) (ar) “Living snow fence” means vegetation that functions as a berm 3or barrier to inhibit the accumulation of snow on the highway during the winter 4season that is planted by the department in a highway right-of-way and the location 5of which is documented by the department.AB521,26Section 2. 84.305 (1) (hm) of the statutes is created to read:AB521,3,7184.305 (1) (hm) “Viewing window” means, with respect to a sign, the area in 2which vegetation removal is authorized by permit within the viewing zone for the 3sign, extending on the main-traveled way of the highway nearest the sign for the 4direction of travel for which the sign face is oriented and extending, in the direction 5opposite of the direction of travel of the main-traveled way from which the sign face 6is visible and intended to be viewed, in a line along the highway pavement edge for 7a distance of 500 continuous feet.AB521,38Section 3. 84.305 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,3,15984.305 (2) Notwithstanding ss. 66.1037 and 86.03, and subject to sub. subs. 10(2m) and (3r), upon application, the department shall issue permits to sign owners 11for the trimming or removal of vegetation that is located in the right-of-way of a 12highway under the jurisdiction of the department for maintenance purposes and 13that obstructs a sign if, within a distance of 500 continuous feet along any portion of 14the viewing zone, any portion of the face of the sign is not viewable because of an 15obstruction to sight by vegetation in the highway right-of-way.AB521,416Section 4. 84.305 (2m) (a) of the statutes is repealed.AB521,517Section 5. 84.305 (2m) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:AB521,3,191884.305 (2m) (ar) A person may apply for a permit under this section for new 19sign locations prior to the construction of the sign.AB521,620Section 6. 84.305 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,4,22184.305 (3) (a) Subject to pars. (d) to (i) (h) and subs. (2m) (b), (4), and (6), a 22permit issued under this section authorizes the permittee to trim or remove 23obstructing vegetation in the viewing window to the extent necessary to eliminate 24the obstruction and provide an unobstructed view of a sign for 500 continuous feet 1within the viewing zone. A permit issued under this section shall specify the 2vegetation or the portion of the highway right-of-way to which the permit applies.AB521,73Section 7. 84.305 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,4,13484.305 (3) (b) An application for a permit under this section shall specifically 5describe the work proposed by the applicant. The department shall grant or deny 6an application for a permit under this section, and notify the applicant of the 7department’s decision, within 60 calendar days of the department’s initial receipt of 8the application. If the department denies an application for a permit under this 9section, the department shall notify the applicant of reasons for the denial. If the 10department does not approve or deny the application within 60 calendar days of the 11department’s initial receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed 12approved and the applicant may schedule vegetation removal with the state outdoor 13advertising coordinator for the appropriate region.AB521,814Section 8. 84.305 (3) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,4,231584.305 (3) (g) A permit issued under this section may not authorize the 16permittee to clear-cut any the highway right-of-way in a specified viewing window. 17The permit authorizes the permittee to trim or remove only the vegetation specified 18in the permit, or only vegetation within the area of the right-of-way specified in the 19permit, in accordance with the terms of the permit. All trimming of vegetation 20authorized under a permit shall be performed in compliance with applicable 21standards of the American National Standards Institute, but if the trimming 22cannot be accomplished in compliance with these standards, the vegetation may be 23removed as provided in sub. (5).AB521,91Section 9. 84.305 (3) (i) of the statutes is repealed.AB521,102Section 10. 84.305 (3r) of the statutes is created to read:AB521,5,6384.305 (3r) (a) A sign owner who was issued a permit under sub. (2) on or 4after May 19, 2012, is not required to apply for subsequent permits for the same 5sign and may trim or remove vegetation in the sign’s specified viewing window 6without additional approval or supervision by the department.AB521,5,127(b) A sign owner acting under the authority of par. (a) shall notify the 8department not less than 15 calendar days prior to any trimming or removal of 9vegetation within the sign’s specified viewing window. No later than 15 calendar 10days after the trimming or removal of vegetation, the sign owner must submit to the 11department photographs of the sign site before and after the trimming or removal 12of vegetation.AB521,1113Section 11. 84.305 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,5,201484.305 (4) Each permit Permits issued under this section shall authorize the 15permittee to employ 3rd-party contractors, including any arborist or landscape 16contractor, to perform work authorized under the permit. Each permit issued 17under this section shall require the permittee to retain a certified arborist for the 18purposes specified in sub. (5) (d). A permittee shall be responsible for any such 19work performed by a contractor on behalf of the permittee that is not authorized by 20the permit as if the work were performed directly by the permittee.AB521,1221Section 12. 84.305 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,6,22284.305 (5) (a) Each permit issued under this section shall require a permittee 23that removes any tree with a diameter of 2 inches or more as measured at breast 1height that is part of a living snow fence to compensate the department for all such 2trees removed, in compliance with the requirements under pars. (d) and (f).AB521,133Section 13. 84.305 (5) (ag) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,6,9484.305 (5) (ag) Each permit issued under this section shall require a 5permittee that removes vegetation to also remove the vegetation’s stump, to grade 6level, and to dispose of all vegetation removed, including the stump, at a location 7away from the highway right-of-way. This paragraph applies to all vegetation 8removal, including first-time permittees, viewing window maintenance, and 9maintenance or removal of a living snow fence. AB521,1410Section 14. 84.305 (5) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,6,141184.305 (5) (d) 1. For each permit issued under sub. (2), a certified arborist 12retained by the permittee the department shall determine the number of trees with 13a diameter of 2 inches or more, as measured at breast height, that are to be 14removed.AB521,6,19153. In calculating the total number of trees under subd. 1., a certified arborist 16shall the department may not include any vegetation that was dead, diseased, or 17determined to be an invasive species at the time of its removal. The applicant shall 18be allowed to remove any dead, diseased, or invasive species within the viewing 19window, regardless of whether it obstructs the view of the sign. AB521,6,23204. In determining whether a tree with multiple leaders has a diameter of 2 21inches or more, as measured at breast height, for purposes of calculating the total 22number of trees under subd. 1., a certified arborist the department shall consider 23only the diameter of the tree’s largest leader.AB521,1524Section 15. 84.305 (5) (f) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,7,4184.305 (5) (f) 1. A permittee shall compensate the department $200, as 2adjusted under subd. 2., $300 for each tree removed under a permit, as calculated 3by the certified arborist retained by the permittee the department according to the 4method specified in par. (d).AB521,165Section 16. 84.305 (5) (f) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB521,176Section 17. 84.305 (5) (f) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB521,7,8784.305 (5) (f) 3. The department shall use the amounts paid to the 8department under subd. 1. to plant living snow fences. AB521,189Section 18. 84.305 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB521,7,131084.305 (6) (a) The department shall have authority to supervise and 11determine how ensure the work authorized under a permit issued under this 12section is carried out in accordance with all associated vegetation removal 13guidelines.AB521,7,1414